Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-121
Annexed or merged city or village; authorized taxes or assessments; city of the metropolitan class; powers.

All taxes or special assessments which any city or village annexed or merged with a city of the metropolitan class as provided in sections 14-117 to 14-125 was authorized to levy or assess, but which are not levied or assessed at the time of such annexation or merger for any kind of public improvements made by such city or village or in process of construction or contracted for, may be levied or assessed by such city of the metropolitan class. The city of the metropolitan class shall have the power to reassess all special assessments or taxes levied or assessed by such city or village thus consolidated with such city in all cases where any city or village was authorized to make reassessments or relevies of such taxes or assessments.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 20, p. 413;

C.S.1922, § 3508;

Laws 1925, c. 166, § 2, p. 434;

C.S.1929, § 14-121;

R.S.1943, § 14-121;

Laws 1953, c. 278, § 1, p. 905;

Laws 1961, c. 30, § 1, p. 146;

Laws 1971, LB 4, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 28.
July 21, 2022
Metropolitan city had authority to levy special assessments after annexation and consolidation with city of smaller class to carry out paving contracts entered into by latter city prior to consolidation. State ex rel. Parks Co. v. Dahlman, 100 Neb. 416, 160 N.W. 117 (1916).